Colorado statutes. TITLE 2 Legislative
PART 13
YOUTH ADVISORY COUNCIL

2-2-1301. Short title.

This part 13 shall be known and may be cited as the "Youth Advisory Council Act".

Source:

L. 2008:

Entire part added, p. 1670, § 1, effective May 29.

L. 2009:

Entire section amended, (HB 09-1099), ch. 92, p. 354, § 1, effective August 5.

2-2-1301.5. Definitions.

As used in this part 13, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Council" means the Colorado youth advisory council created in section 2-2-1302.

"Designated organization" means the nonprofit or private organization designated by the legislative members of the council pursuant to section 2-2-1304 as the custodian of moneys donated to the council through the designated organization.

"Fund" means the youth advisory council cash fund created pursuant to section 2-2-1306.

"Review committee" means the Colorado youth advisory council review committee created in section 2-2-1305.5.

Source:

L. 2009:

Entire section added, (HB 09-1099), ch. 92, p. 354, § 2, effective August 5.

L. 2019:

(4) added, (HB 19-1024), ch. 373, p. 3393, § 1, effective May 30.

2-2-1302. Colorado youth advisory council - creation - purpose.

There is hereby created in the legislative branch the Colorado youth advisory council to examine, evaluate, and discuss the issues, interests, and needs affecting Colorado youth now and in the future and to formally advise and make recommendations to elected officials regarding those issues. The issues may include, but need not be limited to:

Education and skill development;

Employment and economic opportunities and educational opportunities, including increased accessibility to opportunities for youth in rural communities;

Access to state and local government services;

The environment;

Behavioral and physical health, including suicide prevention;

Safe environments for youth, including preventing bullying;

Substance abuse;

Poverty; and

Increased youth participation in state and local government.

Source:

L. 2008:

Entire part added, p. 1670, § 1, effective May 29.

L. 2009:

Entire section amended, (HB 09-1099), ch. 92, p. 355, § 3, effective August 5.

L. 2013:

Entire section amended, (SB 13-148), ch. 390, p. 2264, § 1, effective June 5.

2-2-1303. Membership - selection - terms.

The council consists of forty-four members as follows:

Four nonvoting legislative members, two of whom shall be members of the house of representatives and two of whom shall be members of the senate; and

Thirty-five voting members representing each senate district in the state, one voting member representing the Southern Ute Indian Tribe, one voting member representing the Ute Mountain Ute Tribe, and three nonvoting at-large members. The three at-large members must be selected to help ensure diversity on the council, with an express concern for adequate rural representation. Members described in this subsection (1)(b) must meet the following qualifications at the time of appointment:

Be at least fourteen years of age but not older than nineteen years of age; and

Be enrolled in and attending a tribal or Colorado junior high, middle, or high school, including an online or charter school or approved facility school as defined in section 22-2-402; be participating in a nonpublic, home-based educational program; be participating in a high school equivalency examination program; or have obtained a high school diploma through successful completion of a high school equivalency examination, as defined in section 22-33-102 (8.5).

On or before August 31 of each year, the council members shall approve subsequent appointments to the council. A youth who meets the criteria set forth in subsection (1) of this section may apply to the council to be considered for participation in the council.

The council shall utilize an application process to facilitate council appointments, including the content and availability of the application form, additional selection criteria, and an application review process.

Every effort shall be made to create a council that represents the diversity of the youth of the state.

Nonlegislative council members shall be appointed as follows:

(I) and (II) (Deleted by amendment, L. 2013.)

Legislative members of the council shall be appointed as follows:

On or before December 15, 2014, and on or before December 15 every two years thereafter, the speaker and minority leader of the house of representatives shall each appoint one member from the house of representatives; and

On or before December 15, 2014, and on or before December 15 every two years thereafter, the president and minority leader of the senate shall each appoint one member from the senate.

Council members shall serve two-year terms and, if eligible, may be selected for a subsequent two-year term. In all cases, every effort shall be made to maintain or expand the diversity of the council.

A vacancy on the council shall be filled through a vote of the members for the remainder of the unexpired term. Vacancies of nonlegislative members on the council shall be filled pursuant to the application process described in subsection (2)(a)(III) of this section for biennial appointments. Vacancies of legislative members shall be filled by the appointing authority. Vacancies of nonlegislative members on the council who are not designated as at-large members shall be filled by a youth coming from the same senate district as the departing nonlegislative member.

(4.5) The council shall adopt written bylaws setting forth a leadership structure for the council. The council may amend its bylaws as it determines it is necessary. The council may appoint members to serve in any leadership roles described in its bylaws.

Subject to available appropriations, legislative members of the council shall be compensated for attendance at meetings of the council in the same manner as is provided in section 2-2-307 for legislative members attending meetings during the legislative interim. All expenditures incurred by the council shall be approved by the chair of the legislative council and paid for by vouchers and warrants drawn as provided by law from moneys allocated to the legislative council for legislative committees from appropriations made by the general assembly or from the youth advisory council cash fund created in section 2-2-1306.

Source:

L. 2008:

Entire part added, p. 1671, § 1, effective May 29.

L. 2009:

(4) amended, (HB 09-1099), ch. 92, p. 355, § 4, effective August 5.

L. 2013:

Entire section amended, (SB 13-148), ch. 390, p. 2265, § 2, effective June 5.

L. 2014:

IP(1), IP(1)(b), and (1)(b)(II) amended, (SB 14-058), ch. 102, p. 377, § 1, effective April 7.

L. 2020:

IP(1)(b) and (1)(b)(II) amended, (HB 20-1021), ch. 1, p. 1, § 1, effective February 26.

L. 2022:

(2)(a)(III)(A) and (4) amended and (4.5) added, (SB 22-014), ch. 32, p. 179, § 1, effective March 17.

2-2-1304. Duties - meetings - community outreach - designation of organization to accept donations - authority to contract.

The council shall have the following duties and responsibilities:

To work with any existing and appropriate local and state youth groups to identify the concerns and needs of youth in Colorado and to advise and make oral and written recommendations to members of the general assembly on proposed or pending legislation;

To work with any existing and appropriate local and state youth groups to collect, analyze, and provide information on issues related to youth to the legislative committees, commissions, task forces, and state agencies and departments as appropriate;

To consult with any existing local-level youth advisory councils for input and potential solutions on issues related to youth; and

To set priorities and establish any committees that may be necessary to achieve the goals of the council.

Repealed.

The council shall meet at least four times each year, with two meetings occurring during the regular legislative session and two meetings occurring after the regular legislative session has concluded. Council members may attend and participate in council meetings remotely, but at least two of the council's meetings each year must be held in person, with all attending members at the same physical location. Additional meetings may be held at the discretion of council leadership, subject to available money.

All meetings of the council shall be open to the public.

The council has the authority to develop rules and procedures to govern its activities.

The council shall utilize news outlets and publications, public awareness campaigns, and a website to develop and maintain regular communication concerning its activities with the youth of Colorado, the state of Colorado, and interested parties.

On or before September 1, 2013, and every third September 1 thereafter, the council shall, in conjunction with the director of the legislative council, use a request for proposal process to contract with and designate one or more nonprofit organizations to provide staffing and operational assistance and to serve as the custodian of moneys donated to the council through the designated organization. The designated organization shall not be the custodian of any moneys appropriated by the state and credited to the fund created in section 2-2-1306. The designated organization is authorized to expend any moneys it receives as is necessary for the operation of the council and may solicit and accept monetary and in-kind gifts, grants, and donations used to further the council's duties and responsibilities. Any such moneys donated or awarded to the designated organization for the benefit of the council are not subject to appropriation by the general assembly. Any such moneys obtained by the council or the designated organization and not in the fund that are unexpended and unencumbered at the time the council is dissolved shall be distributed according to appropriate federal and state laws governing nonprofit organizations. If a different nonprofit or private organization is subsequently designated as the custodian of donated moneys in accordance with this paragraph (a), any moneys that are unexpended and unencumbered at the time of the change in designation shall be promptly transferred by the previously designated organization to the newly designated organization.

The designated organization, on behalf of the council, may provide or accept in-kind staff support from nonprofit agencies or private organizations, including itself, or may contract with outside entities for the purpose of providing staff support to assist the council in conducting its duties and responsibilities. Any staff support personnel provided by the designated organization or a nonprofit agency or private organization, either donated or engaged through a contract, shall not be considered employees of the council or the state.

The council is authorized to contract with the designated organization or other nonprofit or private entities for the implementation of this part 13. Any contract entered into by the council must be signed by the chair of the review committee and the chair of the legislative council.

Repealed.

On or before April 30, 2021, and on or before April 30 of each year thereafter, the council shall select five members to serve as nonvoting members of the review committee during the subsequent legislative interim.

The council shall notify the director of research of the legislative council of the appointments made pursuant to this subsection (6).

Source:

L. 2008:

Entire part added, p. 1672, § 1, effective May 29.

L. 2009:

(4) and (5) added, (HB 09-1099), ch. 92, p. 355, § 5, effective August 5.

L. 2013:

(2)(a) repealed and (4)(a) R&RE, (SB 13-148), ch. 390, pp. 2266, 2267, §§ 3, 4, effective June 5.

L. 2019:

(6) added, (HB 19-1024), ch. 373, p. 3393, § 2, effective May 30.

L. 2020:

(6)(b) amended, (SB 20-214), ch. 200, p. 979, § 2, effective June 30.

L. 2022:

(2)(b), (2)(d), and (5) amended, (SB 22-014), ch. 32, p. 180, § 2, effective March 17.

Editor's note:

Subsection (6)(a)(II) provided for the repeal of subsection (6)(a), effective June 30, 2020. (See L. 2019, p. 3393.)

2-2-1305. Reporting requirements.

The council shall report to the review committee during each interim that the review committee meets. The report must include, at a minimum, a summary of the council's recommendations concerning key issues for youth, including any proposals for legislation the council would like the review committee to consider, and a summary of the council's work during the prior year.

Source:

L. 2008:

Entire part added, p. 1673, § 1, effective May 29.

L. 2013:

Entire section amended, (SB 13-148), ch. 390, p. 2267, § 5, effective June 5.

L. 2022:

Entire section amended, (SB 22-014), ch. 32, p. 180, § 3, effective March 17.

2-2-1305.5. Colorado youth advisory council review committee - created.

There is created in the legislative branch the Colorado youth advisory council review committee to review the council's work and to recommend legislation regarding issues affecting Colorado youth. The committee is comprised of ten members, as described in subsection (2) of this section.

The review committee includes five voting members, as follows:

The four legislative members of the council, as described in section 2-2-1303 (1)(a); and

One member of the legislative council, created in section 2-3-301, appointed pursuant to subsection (3) of this section.

The review committee includes as nonvoting members five members of the council, appointed pursuant to section 2-2-1304 (6).

Repealed.

On or before April 30, 2021, and on or before April 30 of each year thereafter, the chair of the legislative council shall appoint the member serving pursuant to subsection (2)(a)(II) of this section to serve during the subsequent legislative interim.

In odd-numbered years, the speaker of the house of representatives shall appoint the chair of the review committee and the president of the senate shall appoint the vice-chair. In even-numbered years, the president of the senate shall appoint the chair and the speaker of the house of representatives shall appoint the vice-chair. The appointing authorities shall make the appointments on or before April 30 of each year.

The review committee may meet up to three times during each interim but may not travel unless authorized by the executive committee of the legislative council. A majority of voting members constitutes a quorum.

Repealed.

The review committee may recommend up to a total of three bills during each interim. Legislation recommended by the review committee must be treated as legislation recommended by an interim committee for purposes of applicable deadlines, bill introduction limits, and any other requirements imposed by the joint rules of the general assembly.

Repealed.

Voting members of the review committee are entitled to compensation pursuant to section 2-2-307. Subject to available funds, nonvoting members may receive reimbursement for expenses from the fund created in section 2-2-1306.

The legislative council staff and the staff of the office of legislative legal services shall assist the review committee in carrying out its duties pursuant to this section.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire section added, (HB 19-1024), ch. 373, p. 3394, § 3, effective May 30.

L. 2020:

(3)(b), (5), and (6) amended, (SB 20-214), ch. 200, p. 980, § 3, effective June 30.

L. 2022:

(4) amended, (SB 22-014), ch. 32, p. 180, § 4, effective March 17.

2-2-1306. Youth advisory council cash fund - created - gifts, grants, and donations.

There is created in the state treasury the youth advisory council cash fund to provide for the direct and indirect costs associated with the implementation of this part 13, including but not limited to lodging, meeting fees, mileage and transportation costs, meals, meeting supplies, copy costs, computer-related costs, any services for which the council contracts, and expenses incurred by nonvoting members of the review committee. The fund shall consist of any money appropriated by the general assembly to the fund and may also include gifts, grants, and donations obtained directly by the council pursuant to this section. The council is authorized to seek and accept gifts, grants, or donations from private or public sources for the purposes of this part 13. All private and public money received by the council through gifts, grants, or donations shall be transmitted to the state treasurer, who shall credit the same to the fund. The money in the fund shall be continuously appropriated for the direct and indirect costs associated with the implementation of this part 13. Any money in the fund not expended for the purposes of this part 13 may be invested by the state treasurer as provided by law. All interest and income derived from the investment and deposit of money in the fund shall be credited to the fund. Any unexpended and unencumbered money remaining in the fund at the end of a fiscal year remains in the fund and shall not be credited or transferred to the general fund or another fund.

Source:

L. 2008:

Entire part added, p. 1673, § 1, effective May 29.

L. 2009:

Entire section amended, (HB 09-1099), ch. 92, p. 356, § 6, effective August 5.

L. 2019:

Entire section amended, (HB 19-1024), ch. 373, p. 3395, § 4, effective May 30.

2-2-1307. Repeal of part.

This part 13 is repealed, effective September 1, 2023. Prior to the repeal of this part 13, the council must be reviewed as provided for in section 2-3-1203.

Source:

L. 2008:

Entire part added, p. 1674, § 1, effective May 29.

L. 2013:

Entire section amended, (SB 13-148), ch. 390, p. 2268, § 7, effective June 5.

L. 2018:

Entire section amended, (HB 18-1186), ch. 175, p. 1208, § 1, effective June 30.